Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-440
Inspection by department; report.

The department may inspect or provide for the inspection of any health care facility or health care service licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act in such manner and at such times as provided in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. The department shall issue an inspection report and provide a copy of the report to the facility or service within ten working days after the completion of an inspection.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 40.